errortag-src/propernoun-sme-morph.txt
LEXICON SARAK-UCASE
 +Sg+Nom:k K ;
 +CmpN/SgN:k Rreal ;
 +Attr+Use/Sub:k K ; !
 +Ess:hin K ;
 +Pl+Nom:hat K ;
 +Pl+Ill:hijdda K ; ! 2-syll stem
 +Sg+Gen:ha K ;
 +Sg+Gen+Use/Sub:k K ; !
 +CmpN/SgG+Use/NG:k Rreal ;
 +CmpN/SgG:ha Rreal ;
 +Sg+Acc:ha K ;
 +Sg+Acc+Use/Sub:k K ; !
 +Sg+Ill:hij K ;
 +Sg+Loc:his K ;
 +Sg+Loc+Use/Sub:hin K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Sg+Com:hijn K ;
 +Pl+Gen:hijd K ;
 +Pl+Acc:hijd K ;
 +Pl+Loc:hijn K ;
 +Pl+Com:hijguin K ;


! Plural lexica
! -------------
LEXICON VARGGAT-plc
 +N+Prop+Plc:%> VARGGATDECL ;
 @U.Cap.Opt@+N+Prop+Plc+Sg+Gen:X4@U.Cap.Opt@ VUONAT ;
 @U.Cap.Opt@+N+Prop+Plc:%>X4t@U.Cap.Opt@ DenominalAdjsC2 ;

LEXICON VARGGAT-org
 +N+Prop+Org:%> VARGGATDECL ;

LEXICON VARGGAT-obj
 +N+Prop+Obj:%> VARGGATDECL ;

!LEXICON VARGGAT
! +N+Prop:%> VARGGATDECL ;

LEXICON VARGGATDECL
! As aleuhtat, but with a marginal leakage
! to sg forms in some cases. (substandard?)
 ALEUHTATDECL ; ! Default.
 @U.Cap.Obl@+Sg+Gen+Use/Sub:ha@U.Cap.Obl@ K ; ! Várggáha   !
 @U.Cap.Obl@+Sg+Loc+Use/Sub:his@U.Cap.Obl@ K ; ! Várggáhis !

LEXICON ALEUHTAT-plc
 +N+Prop+Plc:%> ALEUHTATDECL ;
! @U.Cap.Opt@+N+Prop+Plc:%>@U.Cap.Opt@ DenominalAdjsC ; !SUB
 @U.Cap.Opt@+N+Prop+Plc:%>X4t@U.Cap.Opt@ DenominalAdjsC2 ;
 @U.Cap.Opt@+N+Prop+Plc+Use/Sub:%>@U.Cap.Opt@ DenominalAdjsC3 ; !

LEXICON ALEUHTAT-org
 +N+Prop+Org:%> ALEUHTATDECL ;
 
LEXICON ALEUHTAT-obj
 +N+Prop+Obj:%> ALEUHTATDECL ;


LEXICON ALEUHTAT
 +N+Prop:%> ALEUHTATDECL ;

LEXICON ALEUHTATDECL
 @U.Cap.Obl@ ALEUHTAT-UCASE ;
! @U.Cap.Opt@ ALEUHTAT-DC ; !moved up to -plc

LEXICON ALEUHTAT-UCASE
 +Ess:n K ;
 +Pl+Nom:X4t K ;
! +Pl+Gen:X4t K ; ! The Muosát suohkanstivra fix (Gen in -t for Pl names)
 +Pl+Ill:X5jde K ; ! 2-syll stem
 +Pl:X5 ALEUHTAT-OBL ;

!LEXICON ALEUHTAT-DC	!moved up to -plc

LEXICON ALEUHTAT-OBL ! 2-syll stem
 +Gen:jd K ;
 +Acc:jd K ;
 +Loc:jn K ;
 +Com:jgujn K ;



LEXICON SULLOT-plc
 +N+Prop+Plc:%> SULLOTDECL ;
! @U.Cap.Opt@+N+Prop+Plc:%>@U.Cap.Opt@ DenominalAdjsC ; !SUB
 @U.Cap.Opt@+N+Prop+Plc:%>Y5@U.Cap.Opt@ DenominalAdjsC2 ;
 @U.Cap.Opt@+N+Prop+Plc+Use/Sub:%>Y5@U.Cap.Opt@ DenominalAdjsC3 ; !
 @U.Cap.Opt@+N+Prop+Plc+Sg+Gen:%>Y5@U.Cap.Opt@ VUONAT ;

LEXICON SULLOT-obj
 +N+Prop+Obj:%> SULLOTDECL ;

!LEXICON SULLOT
! +N+Prop:%> SULLOTDECL ;

LEXICON SULLOTDECL
 @U.Cap.Obl@ SULLOT-OBL ;
! @U.Cap.Opt@ SULLOT-DC ; !moved up to -plc

LEXICON SULLOT-OBL
 +Ess:X4n K ;
 +Pl+Nom:Y5t K ;
 +Pl+Ill:Y6jde K ; ! 2-syll stem
 +Pl:Y6 ALEUHTAT-OBL ;

!LEXICON SULLOT-DC	!moved up to -plc

LEXICON EATNAMAT-plc
 +N+Prop+Plc:%> EATNAMATDECL ;
! @U.Cap.Opt@+N+Prop+Plc:%>@U.Cap.Opt@ DenominalAdjsC ; !SUB
 @U.Cap.Opt@+N+Prop+Plc:%>X2@U.Cap.Opt@ DenominalAdjsC2 ;
 @U.Cap.Opt@+N+Prop+Plc+Use/Sub:%>@U.Cap.Opt@ DenominalAdjsC3 ; !


LEXICON EATNAMAT-org
 +N+Prop+Org:%> EATNAMATDECL ;

LEXICON EATNAMAT-obj
 +N+Prop+Obj:%> EATNAMATDECL ;

!LEXICON EATNAMAT
! +N+Prop:%> EATNAMATDECL ;

LEXICON EATNAMATDECL
 @U.Cap.Obl@ EATNAMAT-OBL ;

LEXICON EATNAMAT-OBL
 +Ess:X4in K ;
 +Ess+Use/NG:X7in K ;
 +Pl+Nom:X2at K ;
 +Pl+Ill:ijdda K ; ! 3-syll stem
 +Pl:X2i ALEUHTAT-OBL ;


LEXICON LASSAT-plc ! Place names
 +N+Prop+Plc:%> LASSATDECL ;
! @U.Cap.Opt@+N+Prop+Plc:%>@U.Cap.Opt@ DenominalAdjsC ; !SUB
 @U.Cap.Opt@+N+Prop+Plc:%>Y5@U.Cap.Opt@ DenominalAdjsC2 ;
 @U.Cap.Opt@+N+Prop+Plc+Use/Sub:%>Y5@U.Cap.Opt@ DenominalAdjsC3 ; !


LEXICON LASSATDECL
 @U.Cap.Obl@ LASSAT-OBL ;
! @U.Cap.Opt@ LASSAT-DC ; !moved up to -plc

LEXICON LASSAT-OBL
 +Ess:X4in K ;
 CmpN/SgN+Use/Sub:X8 Rreal ; !
 CmpN/SgN+Use/Sub:X4 Rreal ; !
 CmpN/SgN+Use/Sub:X8- Rreal ; !
 CmpN/SgN+Use/Sub:X4- Rreal ; !
 +Pl+Nom:Y5t K ;
 +Pl+Gen:Y5jd K ;
 +CmpN/PlG:jd Rreal ;
 +Pl+Acc:Y5jd K ;
 +Pl+Ill:Y5jde K ;
 +Pl+Loc:Y5jn K ;
 +Pl+Com:Y5jgujn K ;
 
 
LEXICON ADJAGAT-plc ! Place names
 +N+Prop+Plc:%> ADJAGATDECL ;
! @U.Cap.Opt@+N+Prop+Plc:%>@U.Cap.Opt@ DenominalAdjsC ; !SUB
 @U.Cap.Opt@+N+Prop+Plc:%>X4@U.Cap.Opt@ DenominalAdjsC2 ;
 @U.Cap.Opt@+N+Prop+Plc+Use/Sub:%>X4@U.Cap.Opt@ DenominalAdjsC3 ;  !
 @U.Cap.Opt@+N+Prop+Plc+Sg+Nom:X4@U.Cap.Opt@ VUONAT ;


LEXICON ADJAGATDECL
 @U.Cap.Obl@ ADJAGAT-OBL ;
! @U.Cap.Opt@ ADJAGAT-DC ;

LEXICON ADJAGAT-OBL
 +Ess:X4n K ;
 +CmpN/SgN+Use/Sub:X8 Rreal ; !
 +CmpN/SgN+Use/Sub:X4 Rreal ; !
 +CmpN/SgN+Use/Sub:X8- Rreal ; !
 +CmpN/SgN+Use/Sub:X4- Rreal ; !
 +Pl+Nom:X2at K ;
 +Pl+Gen:X2ijd K ;
 +CmpN/PlG:X2ijd Rreal ;
 +Pl+Acc:X2ijd K ;
 +Pl+Ill:X2ijdda K ;
 +Pl+Loc:X2ijn K ;
 +Pl+Com:X2ijgujn K ;



LEXICON SKANIK-plc !plurals on -k
 @U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Plc:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ SKANIK-UCASE ;
 @U.Cap.Opt@+N+Prop+Plc+Sg+Gen:%>X4@U.Cap.Opt@ VUONAT ;
 @U.Cap.Opt@+N+Prop+Plc:%>k@U.Cap.Opt@ DenominalAdjsC2 ;

LEXICON SKANIK-org !plurals on -k
 +N+Prop+Org:%> SKANIK-UCASE ;



LEXICON SKANIK-UCASE
 +Ess:n K ;
 +Pl+Nom:X4k K ;
 +Pl+Gen:X4k K ; ! The Muosát suohkanstivra fix (Gen in -t for Pl names)
 +Pl+Ill:jde K ; ! 2-syll stem
 +Pl:X5 ALEUHTAT-OBL ;
 

LEXICON ALBMOTMUSEA-org !vow+a
 +N+Prop+Org:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ ALBMOTMUSEA-OBL ;


LEXICON ALBMOTMUSEA-OBL
 +Sg+Nom:a%> K ;
 +CmpN/SgN+Use/Sub:a%>X7 Rreal ; !
 +Sg+Gen:a%> K ;
 +CmpN/SgG+Use/Sub:a%>X7 Rreal ; !
 +Sg+Acc:a%> K ;
 +Sg+Ill:i%>j K ;
 +Sg+Loc:a%>s K ;
 +Sg+Com:a%>jn K ;
 +Ess:a%>n K ;
 +Pl+Nom:a%>t K ;
 +Pl+Gen:a%>jd K ;
 +CmpN/PlG+Use/Sub:a%>jd Rreal ; !
 +Pl+Acc:a%>jd K ;
 +Pl+Ill:a%>jde K ;
 +Pl+Loc:a%>jn K ;
 +Pl+Com:a%>jgujn K ;

! ========================== !
! Common continuation lexica !
! ========================== !


! Lexica making laš-adjectives out of names.

LEXICON PLACELASH
! @U.Cap.Opt@+N+Prop+Plc+Der1+Der/laš:@U.Cap.Opt@lažž DEARVVASLAS ;		!SUB
 @U.Cap.Opt@+N+Prop+Plc+Der1+Der/laš+A+Attr:@U.Cap.Opt@lažž ATTR ;
 @U.Cap.Opt@+N+Prop+Plc+Der1+Der/laš+A:@U.Cap.Opt@lažž JOHTOLAT0 ;
 @U.Cap.Opt@+N+Prop+Plc+Der1+Der/laš+A+Sg+Nom:@U.Cap.Opt@lažža PxV ; ! tentative.
 @U.Cap.Opt@+N+Prop+Plc+Der1+Der/laš+A+Ess:@U.Cap.Opt@lažžan K ;
 @U.Cap.Opt@+N+Prop+Plc+Der1+Der/laš+A+Ess:@U.Cap.Opt@lažžan PxC ;
 @U.Cap.Opt@+N+Prop+Plc+Der1+Der/laš+A:@U.Cap.Opt@lažža LASJOBL ; ! Under ISSORASSA-


LEXICON NENPLACELASH
! @U.Cap.Opt@+N+Prop+Plc+Der1+Der/laš:@U.Cap.Opt@nenlažž DEARVVASLAS ;		!SUB
 @U.Cap.Opt@+N+Prop+Plc+Der1+Der/laš+A+Attr:@U.Cap.Opt@nenlažž ATTR ;
 @U.Cap.Opt@+N+Prop+Plc+Der1+Der/laš+A:@U.Cap.Opt@nenlažž JOHTOLAT0 ;
 @U.Cap.Opt@+N+Prop+Plc+Der1+Der/laš+A+Sg+Nom:@U.Cap.Opt@lažža PxV ; ! tentative.
 @U.Cap.Opt@+N+Prop+Plc+Der1+Der/laš+A+Ess:@U.Cap.Opt@lažžan K ;
 @U.Cap.Opt@+N+Prop+Plc+Der1+Der/laš+A+Ess:@U.Cap.Opt@lažžan PxC ;
 @U.Cap.Opt@+N+Prop+Plc+Der1+Der/laš+A+Sg+Nom:@U.Cap.Opt@nenlažža PxV ; ! tentative.
 @U.Cap.Opt@+N+Prop+Plc+Der1+Der/laš+A+Ess:@U.Cap.Opt@nenlažžan K ;
 @U.Cap.Opt@+N+Prop+Plc+Der1+Der/laš+A+Ess:@U.Cap.Opt@nenlažžan PxC ; ! tentative, check.
 @U.Cap.Opt@+N+Prop+Plc+Der1+Der/laš+A:@U.Cap.Opt@nenlažža LASJOBL ;
